Utah statutes.
31A-22-606.   Policy examination period.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), all accident and health
policies shall contain a notice prominently printed on or attached to the
cover or front page stating that the policyholder has the right to return the
policy for any reason within ten days after its delivery.
(b)  "Return" means delivery to the insurer or its agent or mailing of the
policy to either, properly addressed and stamped for first class handling,
with a written statement on the policy or an accompanying communication that
it is being returned for termination of coverage.  A policy returned under
this Subsection (1) is void from the beginning and a policyholder returning
his policy is entitled to a refund of any premium paid.
(2)  This section does not apply to:
(a)  group policies;
(b)  policies issued to persons entitled to a 30-day examination period under
Subsection 31A-22-605(9);
(c)  single premium nonrenewable policies issued for terms not longer than 60
days;
(d)  policies covering accidents only or accidental bodily injury only; and
(e)  other classes of policies which the commissioner by rule specifies after
a finding that a right to return those policies would be impracticable or
unnecessary to protect the policyholder's interests.
